Hawaii statutes.
B.
Accountability

[§302A-1001] Student bias. No person
in the State, on the basis of sex, shall be excluded from participation in, be
denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination under any educational
or recreational program or activity receiving state or county financial
assistance or utilizing state or county facilities. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Cross References

Gender equity in sports, see §§302A-461 to 467.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next